Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Chapter 40. United States Savings Bonds Purchase Plan.

Sec. 39.40.010.
Authorization.

An employee of the state may give written authorization to permit an employer to deduct a sum of money each month from the employee’s wages for the purchase of United States savings bonds.
The United States savings bonds purchased shall be made payable to the person specified by the employee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 46 SLA 1963)

Sec. 39.40.020.
Administration.

The wage deductions withheld under AS

39.40.010

shall be held in trust until a United States savings bond is purchased by the Department of Administration. After the purchase of the bond, it shall be turned over to the employee.

The Department of Administration shall adopt regulations to carry out this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 46 SLA 1963)